Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-418
Building regulations; scope of operation; jurisdiction of city council.

The powers granted in sections 14-401 to 14-417 may be exercised by the authorities in whom the powers are vested in said sections over such city and all territory not over three miles beyond the limits of such city.

Laws 1925, c. 45, § 12, p. 186;

C.S.1929, § 14-415;

R.S.1943, § 14-418.

Cities of metropolitan class were authorized to zone territory within three miles of corporate limits. Schlientz v. City of North Platte, 172 Neb. 477, 110 N.W.2d 58 (1961).

Authority of city to zone may be exercised over all territory not over three miles beyond city limits. Peterson v. Vasak, 162 Neb. 498, 76 N.W.2d 420 (1956).